North Carolina statutes. Chapter 139. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 139-1.
Title of Chapter.

This Chapter may be known and cited as the Soil Conservation Districts Law.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Introduction to Water Use Law in North Carolina,” see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1967).

For note on disposition of diffused surface waters in North Carolina, see 47 N.C.L. Rev. 205 (1968).

For article, “The Evolution of Modern North Carolina Environmental and Conservation Policy Legislation,” see 29 Campbell L. Rev. 535 (2007).

§ 139-2.
Legislative determinations, and declaration of policy.

Legislative Determinations. — It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination:

The Condition. — The farm, forest and grazing lands of the State of North Carolina are among the basic assets of the State and the preservation of these lands is necessary to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of its people; improper land-use practices have caused and have contributed to, and are now causing and contributing to, a progressively more serious erosion of the farm and grazing lands of this State by wind and water; the breaking of natural grass, plant, and forest cover has interfered with the natural factors of soil stabilization, causing loosening of soil and exhaustion of humus, and developing a soil condition that favors erosion; the topsoil is being blown and washed out of fields and pastures; there has been an accelerated washing of sloping fields; these processes of erosion by wind and water speed up with removal of absorptive topsoil, causing exposure of less absorptive and less protective but more erosive subsoil; failure by any land occupier to conserve the soil and control erosion upon his lands causes a washing and blowing of soil and water from his lands onto other lands and makes the conservation of soil and control of erosion on such other lands difficult or impossible.

The Consequences. — The consequences of such soil erosion in the form of soil-blowing and soil-washing are the silting and sedimentation of stream channels, reservoirs, dams, ditches, and harbors; the loss of fertile soil material in dust storms; the piling up of soil on lower slopes, and its deposit over alluvial plains; the reduction in productivity or outright ruin of rich bottomlands by overwash of poor subsoil material, sand, and gravel swept out of the hills; deterioration of soil and its fertility, deterioration of crops grown thereon, and declining acre yields despite development of scientific processes for increasing such yields; loss of soil and water which causes destruction of food and cover for wildlife; a blowing and washing of soil into streams which silts over spawning beds, and destroys water plants, diminishing the food supply of fish; a diminishing of the underground water reserve, which causes water shortages, intensifies periods of drought, and causes crop failures; an increase in the speed and volume of rainfall runoff, causing severe and increasing floods, which bring suffering, disease, and death; impoverishment of families attempting to farm eroding and eroded lands; damage to roads, highways, railways, farm buildings, and other property from floods and from dust storms; and losses in navigation, hydroelectric power, municipal water supply, drainage developments, farming, and grazing.

The Appropriate Corrective Methods. — To conserve soil resources and control and prevent soil erosion and prevent floodwater and sediment damages, and further the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water, and the development of water resources it is necessary that land-use practices contributing to soil wastage and soil erosion be discouraged and discontinued, and appropriate soil-conserving land-use practices and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water and the development of water resources be adopted and carried out. Among the procedures necessary for widespread adoption, are the carrying on of engineering operations such as the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check-dams, desilting basins, floodwater retarding structures, channel improvements, floodways, dikes, ponds, ditches, and the like; the utilization of strip cropping, lister furrowing, contour cultivating, contour furrowing, farm drainage, land irrigation; seeding and planting of waste, sloping, abandoned, or eroded lands with water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses; forestation and reforestation; rotation of crops; soil stabilization with trees, grasses, legumes, and other thick-growing, soil-holding crops; the addition of soil amendments, manurial materials, and fertilizers for the correction of soil deficiencies and to promote increased growth of soil-protecting crops; retardation of runoff by increasing absorption of rainfall; and retirement from cultivation of steep, highly erosive areas and areas now badly gullied or otherwise eroded.

Declaration of Policy. — It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature to provide for the conservation of the soil and soil resources of this State, and for the control and prevention of soil erosion, and for the prevention of floodwater and sediment damages, and for furthering the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water, and the development of water resources and thereby to preserve natural resources, control floods, prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs, assist in maintaining the navigability of rivers and harbors, preserve wildlife, protect the tax base, protect public lands, and protect and promote the health, safety and general welfare of the people of this State.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 2; 1947, c. 131, s. 1; 1959, c. 781, ss. 2, 3.

§ 139-3.
Definitions.

Wherever used or referred to in this Chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Agency of this State” includes the government of this State and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the government of the State.

“A qualified voter” includes any person qualified to vote in elections by the people under the Constitution of this State.

“Environmental Management Commission” or “State Environmental Management Commission” means the Environmental Management Commission of the State of North Carolina, or the board, body or commission succeeding to its principal functions, or in whom shall be vested by law the powers herein granted to the said Environmental Management Commission.

“Commission” or “Soil and Water Conservation Commission” means the Soil and Water Conservation Commission created by

G.S. 106-840

.

(4a)

“Conservation easement” has the same meaning as provided in

G.S. 40A-80

.

“District” or “soil and water conservation district” means a governmental subdivision of this State, and a public body corporate and politic, organized in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions hereinafter set forth.

“Due notice” means notice given by posting the same at the courthouse door and at three other public places in the county, including those where it may be customary to post notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally, not less than 10 days before the date of the event of which notice is being given. At any hearing held pursuant to such a notice at the time and place designated in such a notice, adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity of renewing such notice for such adjourned dates.

“Government” or “governmental” includes the government of this State, the government of the United States, and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

The terms “land occupier” or “occupier of land,” and “landowner” or “owner of land” include any person, firm or corporation who shall hold title to or shall have contracted to purchase any lands lying within a soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this Chapter.

“Nominating petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of

G.S. 139-6

to nominate candidates for the office of supervisor of a soil and water conservation district.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, s. 1.

“Petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter for the creation of a soil and water conservation district.

“State” means the State of North Carolina.

“Supervisor” means one of the members of the governing body of a district, elected or appointed in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, s. 1.

“United States” or “agencies of the United States” includes the United States of America, the Soil Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, and any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, s. 1.

A “watershed improvement project” means a project of watershed improvement (whether involving flood prevention, drainage improvement, water supply, soil and water conservation, recreation facilities, fish and wildlife habitat, or other related purposes, singly or in combination) which is undertaken:

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 391, s. 1.

By a soil and water conservation district under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 139 of the General Statutes or any local act granting similar powers.

By a drainage district under the provisions of Chapter 156 of the General Statutes or any local act granting similar powers.

By a county that is carrying out a county watershed improvement program under the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 139 of the General Statutes or any local act granting similar powers.

By any combination of the foregoing, acting as joint sponsors of a watershed improvement program.

By any watershed, drainage or flood control project planned or carried out by the Soil Conservation Service, Tennessee Valley Authority or the Army Corps of Engineers.

A “watershed improvement work” means a single feature or facility or portion of a watershed improvement project, such as a water retarding or impoundment structure for one or more authorized watershed purposes or a section of improved stream channel or the land treatment measures associated with a water retarding structure.

“Job approval authority” means the authority granted by the Commission to Soil and Water Conservation District staff or employees of the Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services who have demonstrated the appropriate knowledge, skill, and ability to plan, design, and certify the installation of best management practices approved for cost-share funding pursuant to programs identified in G.S. 139-4(d)(9).

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 3; 1947, c. 131, s. 2; 1959, c. 781, s. 4; 1965, c. 582, s. 1; 1967, c. 987, s. 1; 1971, c. 1138, s. 1A; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38; 1993, c. 391, s. 1; 1995, c. 519, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(h); 2011-209, s. 1; 2020-18, s. 7(b).

Cross References.

As to the Environmental Management Commission, see G.S. 143B-282 et seq.

As to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, see

G.S. 106-840

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1967, c. 987, which amended or added various sections in this Chapter, provides in part:

“Sec. 11. Nothing contained in this act shall authorize or allow the withdrawal of water from a watershed or stream except to the extent and degree now permissible under the existing common and statute law of this State; nor to change or modify such existing common or statute law with respect to the relative rights of riparian owners or others concerning the use or disposal of water in the streams of this State; nor to authorize a district, its officers or governing body or any other person, firm, corporation (public or private), body politic or governmental agency to utilize or dispose of water except in the manner and to the extent permitted by the existing common and statute law of this State.

“Sec. 12. The authority granted hereinabove is supplemental and additional to any other authority granted by law relating to watershed improvement programs, whether by general or special law.”

Session Laws 2011-209, provides in its preamble: “Whereas, North Carolina is and always has been a leader in soil and water conservation, with the nation’s first soil and water conservation district established in Brown Creek, Anson County, under the leadership of Dr. Hugh Hammond Bennett, the ‘father of soil conservation’ in the United States; and

“Whereas, soil and water conservation districts continue into the 21st century to provide a critical voluntary, nonregulatory means to enhance conservation values of private lands, including much of the State’s agricultural and timber lands; and

“Whereas, conservation easements provide an increasingly important way that soil and water conservation districts, along with other units of State and local government and private land trusts, help private landowners conserve important soil and water resources on their property; and

“Whereas, to be effective in the long run, conservation easements require long-term or perpetual monitoring to assure that the intent of the easement donors and sellers is honored; and

“Whereas, soil and water conservation districts receive funds from diverse sources for long-term easement stewardship, including private contributions and donations, portions of transaction fees, donations from private charitable foundations, and contributions from and appropriation of public funds; and

“Whereas, the current local budgeting and finance laws do not adequately provide a means to ensure that these funds are dedicated to long-term or perpetual stewardship of conservation easements; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2020-18, s. 16(a), is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(h), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “G.S. 106-840” for “G.S. 143B-294” in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2011-209, s. 1, effective July 1, 2011, added subdivision (4a).

Session Laws 2020-18, s. 7(b), effective June 12, 2020, added subdivision (19).

§ 139-3.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-217, s. 14(a), effective October 31, 1998.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1998-217, which repealed this section, in s. 14(b) provides:
“The repeal of this section shall not be construed to affect any language currently in the General Statutes.”

§ 139-4.
Powers and duties of Soil and Water Conservation Commission generally.

through (c) Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 38.

(d)

In addition to the duties and powers hereinafter conferred upon the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, it shall have the following duties and powers:

To offer such assistance as may be appropriate to the supervisors of soil and water conservation districts, organized as provided hereinafter, in the carrying out of any of their powers and programs.

To keep the supervisors of each of the several districts organized under the provisions of this Chapter informed of the activities and experience of all other districts organized hereunder, and to facilitate an interchange of advice and experience between such districts and cooperation between them.

To coordinate the programs of the several soil and water conservation districts organized hereunder so far as this may be done by advice and consultation.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies, and of agencies of this State, in the work of such districts.

To disseminate information throughout the State concerning the activities and programs of the soil and water conservation districts organized hereunder, and to encourage the formation of such districts in areas where their organization is desirable.

Upon the filing of a petition signed by all of the district supervisors of any one or more districts requesting a change in the boundary lines of said district or districts, the Commission may change such lines in such manner as in its judgment would best serve the interests of the occupiers of land in the area affected thereby.

To receive, review and approve or disapprove applications for planning assistance under the provisions of Public Law 566 (83rd Congress, as amended), and recommend priorities on such applications.

To supervise and review small watershed work plans pursuant to

G.S. 139-41.2

and 139-47.

To create, implement, and supervise the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control created pursuant to Article 72 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes, the Community Conservation Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 73 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes, the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter, and the Streamflow Rehabilitation Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter.

To review and approve or disapprove the application of a district supervisor for a grant under the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control, the Community Conservation Assistance Program, or the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program as provided by G.S. 139-8(b).

To develop and implement a program for the approval of water quality and animal waste management systems technical specialists.

To develop and approve best management practices for the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control and for use in water quality protection and water use efficiency, availability, and storage programs and to adopt rules that establish criteria governing approval of these best management practices.

To establish a training program required for all district supervisors.

To develop and implement a program for granting job approval authority to Soil and Water Conservation District staff and employees of the Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to plan, design, and certify the installation of best management practices approved for cost-share funding pursuant to programs identified in G.S. 139-4(d)(9).

(e)

A member of the Commission or an organization or unit of local government of which the member is an employee, officer, or elected member of the governing body may apply for and receive a grant under the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control, the Community Conservation Assistance Program, the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program, or the Streamflow Rehabilitation Assistance Program if:

(1)

The member does not vote on the application or attempt to influence the outcome of any action on the application; and

(2)

The application is approved by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 4; 1947, c. 131, s. 3; 1953, c. 255; 1957, c. 1374, s. 1; 1959, c. 781, s. 5; 1961, c. 746, s. 2; 1965, c. 582, s. 2; c. 932; 1971, c. 396; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38; 1981, c. 326, s. 1; 1995, c. 519, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-284, s. 1; 2006-78, s. 3; 2011-145, ss. 13.23(c), (d), 13.22A(i), (j); 2012-142, s. 11.6(b); 2012-145, s. 4.3; 2016-113, s. 5(a); 2020-18, s. 7(c); 2021-180, s. 5.9(m), (n).

State Government Reorganization.

The Soil and Water Conservation Committee (now the Soil and Water Conservation Commission) was transferred to the Department of Natural and Economic Resources (now the Department of Environment and Natural Resources) by former G.S. 143A-124, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864 and repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, and remained a part of the Department of Environmental Resources under G.S. 143B-279.3(b)(21), until being transferred to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(a), (b), effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2001-355, ss. 1 to 6, as amended by Session Laws
2013-413, s. 57(y), provide for the implementation of the Tar-Pamlico River Basin-Nutrient Sensitive Waters Management Strategy: Agricultural Nutrient Control Strategy, as adopted by the Environmental Management Commission on 12 October 2000 and approved by the Rules Review Commission on 20 November 2000, to become effective on 1 September 2001. A Local Advisory Committee is to be appointed in each county or watershed, as specified in the Basin Oversight Committee, within the Tar-Pamlico River Basin; these committees terminate upon a finding by the Environmental Management Commission that the long-term maintenance of nutrient loads is assured. Under the act, the Soil and Water Commission is to approve best management practices for pasture-based production or management of livestock, including a point system applicable thereto. Harvesting of trees is also addressed. Furthermore, the Basin Oversight Committee is to develop a nutrient loading accounting methodology, to be approved by the Environmental Management Commission no later than 1 March 2003. The Environmental Management Commission may adopt and revise a temporary rule incorporating the provisions of the act until a permanent rule can be adopted. Session Laws
2001-355, s. 7, provides that ss. 2 and 3 of the act expire when the temporary rule becomes effective, and s. 4 expires upon a finding that the long-term maintenance of nutrient loads in the Tar-Pamlico River Basin is assured. Session Laws
2017-10, s. 3.9, repealed Session Laws
2001-355, s. 4, effective May 4, 2017.

In subdivision (d)(9) above, “Article 73 of Chapter 106” was substituted for “Part 11 of Article 21 of Chapter 143” to conform to the recodification of Part 11 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 as Article 73 of Chapter 106 by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 13.22A(x).

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 13.22A(dd), provides:
“The Revisor of Statutes shall make the conforming statutory changes necessary to reflect the transfers under subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Revisor of Statutes may correct any reference in the General Statutes to the statutes that are recodified by this section and any other conforming changes necessitated by this section.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011’.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2017-10, s. 5.1, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2020-18, s. 16(a), is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-78, s. 3, effective July 10, 2006, rewrote subdivision (d)(9); in subdivision (d)(10), inserted “or the Community Conservation Assistance Program,” and substituted “139-8(b)” for “139-8(13)”; and added “and the Community Conservation Assistance Program” near the end of subsection (e).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(i), (j), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Article 72 of Chapter 106” for “Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143” in subdivision (d)(9); inserted “the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control and for” in subdivision (d)(12); and substituted “Commissioner of Agriculture” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (e)(2).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.23(c), (d), effective July 1, 2011, in subdivision (d)(9), added “and the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter” and made a minor stylistic change; and in subdivision (d)(10); and in subsection (e), inserted “or the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program” and made minor stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 11.6(b), as added by Session Laws 2012-145, s. 4.3, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “water quality protection and water use efficiency, availability, and storage programs” for “the water quality protection programs of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (d)(12).

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 5(a), effective July 26, 2016, added subdivision (d)(13).

Session Laws 2020-18, s. 7(c), effective June 12, 2020, added subdivision (d)(14).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 5.9(m) and (n), effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision (d)(9), added “and the Streamflow…Article 6 of this Chapter,” and made a related change; and in subsection (e), added “or an organization or unit…of the governing body,” and “or the Streamflow Rehabilitation Assistance Program,” and made a related change.